src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX k   cer      a-o           cer
SFX k   cer      a-os          cer
SFX k   cer      am-me         cer
SFX k   cer      am-te         cer
SFX k   cer      am-se         cer
SFX k   cer      am-se-lhe     cer
SFX k   cer      am-se-lhes    cer
SFX k   cer      am-vos        cer
SFX k   cer      am-lhe        cer
SFX k   cer      am-lhes       cer
SFX k   cer      am-na         cer
SFX k   cer      am-nas        cer
SFX k   cer      am-no         cer
SFX k   cer      am-nos        cer
SFX k   cer      amos-te       cer
SFX k   cer      amo-nos       cer
SFX k   cer      amo-vos       cer
SFX k   cer      amos-lhe      cer
SFX k   cer      amos-lhes     cer
SFX k   cer      o-me          cer
SFX k   cer      o-te          cer
SFX k   cer      o-nos         cer
SFX k   cer      o-vos         cer
SFX k   cer      o-lhe         cer
SFX k   cer      o-lhes        cer
SFX k   cer      o-a           cer
SFX k   cer      o-as          cer
SFX k   cer      o-o           cer
SFX k   cer      o-os          cer
SFX k   edir    ida-me         gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-te         gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-se         gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-se-lhe     gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-se-lhes    gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-nos        gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-vos        gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-lhe        gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-lhes       gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-a          gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-as         gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-o          gredir
SFX k   edir    ida-os         gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-me        gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-te        gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-se        gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-se-lhe    gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-se-lhes   gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-vos       gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-lhe       gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-lhes      gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-na        gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-nas       gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-no        gredir
SFX k   edir    idam-nos       gredir
SFX k   edir    idamos-te      gredir
SFX k   edir    idamo-nos      gredir
SFX k   edir    idamo-vos      gredir
SFX k   edir    idamos-lhe     gredir
SFX k   edir    idamos-lhes    gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-me         gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-te         gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-se         gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-se-lhe     gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-se-lhes    gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-nos        gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-vos        gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-lhe        gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-lhes       gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-a          gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-as         gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-o          gredir
SFX k   edir    ide-os         gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-me        gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-te        gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-se        gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-se-lhe    gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-se-lhes   gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-vos       gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-lhe       gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-lhes      gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-na        gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-nas       gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-no        gredir
SFX k   edir    idem-nos       gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-me         gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-te         gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-vos        gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-lhe        gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-lhes       gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-a          gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-as         gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-o          gredir
SFX k   edir    ido-os         gredir
SFX k   entir   inta-me        entir
SFX k   entir   inta-te        entir
SFX k   entir   inta-se        entir
SFX k   entir   inta-se-lhe    entir
SFX k   entir   inta-se-lhes   entir
SFX k   entir   inta-nos       entir
SFX k   entir   inta-vos       entir
SFX k   entir   inta-lhe       entir
SFX k   entir   inta-lhes      entir
SFX k   entir   inta-a         entir
SFX k   entir   inta-as        entir
SFX k   entir   inta-o         entir
SFX k   entir   inta-os        entir
SFX k   entir   intam-me       entir
SFX k   entir   intam-te       entir
SFX k   entir   intam-se       entir
SFX k   entir   intam-se-lhe   entir
SFX k   entir   intam-se-lhes  entir
SFX k   entir   intam-vos      entir
SFX k   entir   intam-lhe      entir
SFX k   entir   intam-lhes     entir
SFX k   entir   intam-na       entir
SFX k   entir   intam-nas      entir
SFX k   entir   intam-no       entir
SFX k   entir   intam-nos      entir
SFX k   entir   intamo-nos     entir
SFX k   entir   intamo-vos     entir
SFX k   entir   intamos-lhe    entir
SFX k   entir   intamos-lhes   entir
SFX k   entir   into-me        entir
SFX k   entir   into-te        entir
SFX k   entir   into-vos       entir
SFX k   entir   into-lhe       entir
SFX k   entir   into-lhes      entir
SFX k   entir   into-a         entir
SFX k   entir   into-as        entir
SFX k   entir   into-o         entir
SFX k   entir   into-os        entir
SFX k   er      -me            jazer
SFX k   er      -te            jazer
SFX k   er      -se            jazer
SFX k   er      -se-lhe        jazer
SFX k   er      -se-lhes       jazer
SFX k   er      -nos           jazer
SFX k   er      -vos           jazer
SFX k   er      -lhe           jazer
SFX k   er      -lhes          jazer
SFX k   zer     -la            jazer
SFX k   zer     -las           jazer
SFX k   zer     -lo            jazer
SFX k   zer     -los           jazer
SFX k   er      a-me           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-te           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-se           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-se-lhe       [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-se-lhes      [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-nos          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-vos          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-lhe          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-lhes         [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-a            [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-as           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-o            [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      a-os           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-me          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-te          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-se          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-se-lhe      [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-se-lhes     [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-vos         [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-lhe         [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-lhes        [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-na          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-nas         [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-no          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      am-nos         [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      amos-te        [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      amo-nos        [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      amo-vos        [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      amos-lhe       [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      amos-lhes      [^cgu]er
SFX k   er       -la           er
SFX k   er       -las          er
SFX k   er       -lo           er
SFX k   er       -los          er
SFX k   er       -la-          er
SFX k   er       -las-         er
SFX k   er       -lo-          er
SFX k   er       -los-         er
SFX k   er       -la- s        er
SFX k   er       -las- s       er
SFX k   er       -lo- s        er
SFX k   er       -los- s       er
SFX k   er       -la-ei        er
SFX k   er       -las-ei       er
SFX k   er       -lo-ei        er
SFX k   er       -los-ei       er
SFX k   er       -la-ia        er
SFX k   er       -las-ia       er
SFX k   er       -lo-ia        er
SFX k   er       -los-ia       er
SFX k   er       -la-iam       er
SFX k   er       -las-iam      er
SFX k   er       -lo-iam       er
SFX k   er       -los-iam      er
SFX k   er      i-me           er
SFX k   er      i-te           er
SFX k   er      i-nos          er
SFX k   er      i-vos          er
SFX k   er      i-lhe          er
SFX k   er      i-lhes         er
SFX k   er      i-a            er
SFX k   er      i-as           er
SFX k   er      i-o            er
SFX k   er      i-os           er
SFX k   er      ia-me          er
SFX k   er      ia-te          er
SFX k   er      ia-se          er
SFX k   er      ia-se-lhe      er
SFX k   er      ia-se-lhes     er
SFX k   er      ia-nos         er
SFX k   er      ia-vos         er
SFX k   er      ia-lhe         er
SFX k   er      ia-lhes        er
SFX k   er      ia-a           er
SFX k   er      ia-as          er
SFX k   er      ia-o           er
SFX k   er      ia-os          er
SFX k   er      iam-me         er
SFX k   er      iam-te         er
SFX k   er      iam-se         er
SFX k   er      iam-se-lhe     er
SFX k   er      iam-se-lhes    er
SFX k   er      iam-vos        er
SFX k   er      iam-lhe        er
SFX k   er      iam-lhes       er
SFX k   er      iam-na         er
SFX k   er      iam-nas        er
SFX k   er      iam-no         er
SFX k   er      iam-nos        er
SFX k   er       amos-te       er
SFX k   er       amo-nos       er
SFX k   er       amo-vos       er
SFX k   er       amos-lhe      er
SFX k   er       amos-lhes     er
SFX k   er      o-me           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-te           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-vos          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-lhe          [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-lhes         [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-a            [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-as           [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-o            [^cgu]er
SFX k   er      o-os           [^cgu]er
SFX k   ertir   irta-me        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-te        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-se        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-se-lhe    vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-se-lhes   vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-nos       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-vos       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-lhe       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-lhes      vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-a         vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-as        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-o         vertir
SFX k   ertir   irta-os        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-me       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-te       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-se       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-se-lhe   vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-se-lhes  vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-vos      vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-lhe      vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-lhes     vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-na       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-nas      vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-no       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtam-nos      vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtamos-te     vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtamo-nos     vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtamo-vos     vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtamos-lhe    vertir
SFX k   ertir   irtamos-lhes   vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-me        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-te        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-vos       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-lhe       vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-lhes      vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-a         vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-as        vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-o         vertir
SFX k   ertir   irto-os        vertir
SFX k   ger     ja-me          ger
SFX k   ger     ja-te          ger
SFX k   ger     ja-se          ger
SFX k   ger     ja-se-lhe      ger
SFX k   ger     ja-se-lhes     ger
SFX k   ger     ja-nos         ger
SFX k   ger     ja-vos         ger
SFX k   ger     ja-lhe         ger
SFX k   ger     ja-lhes        ger
SFX k   ger     ja-a           ger
SFX k   ger     ja-as          ger
SFX k   ger     ja-o           ger
SFX k   ger     ja-os          ger
SFX k   ger     jam-me         ger
SFX k   ger     jam-te         ger
SFX k   ger     jam-se         ger
SFX k   ger     jam-se-lhe     ger
SFX k   ger     jam-se-lhes    ger
SFX k   ger     jam-vos        ger
SFX k   ger     jam-lhe        ger
SFX k   ger     jam-lhes       ger
SFX k   ger     jam-na         ger
SFX k   ger     jam-nas        ger
SFX k   ger     jam-no         ger
SFX k   ger     jam-nos        ger
SFX k   ger     jamos-te       ger
SFX k   ger     jamo-nos       ger
SFX k   ger     jamo-vos       ger
SFX k   ger     jamos-lhe      ger
SFX k   ger     jamos-lhes     ger
SFX k   ger     jo-me          ger
SFX k   ger     jo-te          ger
SFX k   ger     jo-nos         ger
SFX k   ger     jo-vos         ger
SFX k   ger     jo-lhe         ger
SFX k   ger     jo-lhes        ger
SFX k   ger     jo-a           ger
SFX k   ger     jo-as          ger
SFX k   ger     jo-o           ger
SFX k   ger     jo-os          ger
SFX k   guer    ga-me          guer
